Illinois, session 104th, HB3343.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Telehealth Act is amended by changing 5Section 5 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 150/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Asynchronous store and forward system" means the 9transmission of a patient's medical information through an 10electronic communications system at an originating site to a 11health care professional or facility at a distant site that 12does not require real-time or synchronous interaction between 13the health care professional and the patient.14    "Distant site" means the location at which the health care 15professional rendering the telehealth service is located.16    "Established patient" means a patient with a relationship 17with a health care professional in which there has been an 18exchange of an individual's protected health information for 19the purpose of providing patient care, treatment, or services.20    "E-visit" means a patient-initiated non-face-to-face 21communication through an online patient portal between an 22established patient and a health care professional.23    "Facility" includes a facility that is owned or operated   HB3343 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 09578 AAS 19641 b1by a hospital under the Hospital Licensing Act or University 2of Illinois Hospital Act, a facility under the Nursing Home 3Care Act, a rural health clinic, a federally qualified health 4center, a local health department, a community mental health 5center, a behavioral health clinic as defined in 89 Ill. Adm. 6Code 140.453, an encounter rate clinic, a skilled nursing 7facility, a substance use treatment program licensed by the 8Division of Substance Use Prevention and Recovery of the 9Department of Human Services, a school-based health center as 10defined in 77 Ill. Adm. Code 641.10, a physician's office, a 11podiatrist's office, a supportive living program provider, a 12hospice provider, home health agency, or home nursing agency 13under the Home Health, Home Services, and Home Nursing Agency 14Licensing Act, a facility under the ID/DD Community Care Act, 15community-integrated living arrangements as defined in the 16Community-Integrated Living Arrangements Licensure and 17Certification Act, and a provider who receives reimbursement 18for a patient's room and board. 19    "Health care professional" includes, but is not limited 20to, physicians, physician assistants, optometrists, advanced 21practice registered nurses, clinical psychologists licensed in 22Illinois, prescribing psychologists licensed in Illinois, 23dentists, occupational therapists, pharmacists, physical 24therapists, acupuncturists, clinical social workers, 25speech-language pathologists, audiologists, hearing 26instrument dispensers, licensed certified substance use   HB3343 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 09578 AAS 19641 b1disorder treatment providers and clinicians, and mental health 2professionals and clinicians authorized by Illinois law to 3provide mental health services, and qualified providers listed 4under paragraph (8) of subsection (e) of Section 3 of the Early 5Intervention Services System Act, dietitian nutritionists 6licensed in Illinois, and health care professionals associated 7with a facility. 8    "Interactive telecommunications system" means an audio and 9video system, an audio-only telephone system (landline or 10cellular), or any other telecommunications system permitting 112-way, synchronous interactive communication between a patient 12at an originating site and a health care professional or 13facility at a distant site. "Interactive telecommunications 14system" does not include a facsimile machine, electronic mail 15messaging, or text messaging.16    "Originating site" means the location at which the patient 17is located at the time telehealth services are provided to the 18patient via telehealth.19    "Remote patient monitoring" means the use of connected 20digital technologies or mobile medical devices to collect 21medical and other health data from a patient at one location 22and electronically transmit that data to a health care 23professional or facility at a different location for 24collection and interpretation. 25    "Telehealth services" means the evaluation, diagnosis, or 26interpretation of electronically transmitted patient-specific   HB3343 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 09578 AAS 19641 b1data between a remote location and a licensed health care 2professional that generates interaction or treatment 3recommendations. "Telehealth services" includes telemedicine 4and the delivery of health care services, including mental 5health treatment and substance use disorder treatment and 6services to a patient, regardless of patient location, 7provided by way of an interactive telecommunications system, 8asynchronous store and forward system, remote patient 9monitoring technologies, e-visits, or virtual check-ins.10    "Virtual check-in" means a brief patient-initiated 11communication using a technology-based service, excluding 12facsimile, between an established patient and a health care 13professional. "Virtual check-in" does not include 14communications from a related office visit provided within the 15previous 7 days, nor communications that lead to an office 16visit or procedure within the next 24 hours or soonest 17available appointment. 18(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-84, eff. 7-19-19; 19102-104, eff. 7-22-21.) 20    Section 10. The Acupuncture Practice Act is amended by 21adding Section 14 as follows: 22    (225 ILCS 2/14 new)23    Sec. 14. Telemedicine.24    (a) The General Assembly finds that, because technological   HB3343 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 09578 AAS 19641 b1advances and changing practice patterns regarding the use of 2health care services are occurring with increasing frequency 3across state lines and across increasing geographical 4distances within this State, certain technological advances in 5the health care industry are in the public interest. Providing 6professional health care services is a privilege and is 7necessary for the protection of the public health, welfare, 8and safety, especially when a pandemic can limit access to 9traditional means of accessing health care services.10    (b) For purposes of this Act, "telemedicine" means the 11performance of acupuncture limited to modalities and 12consultations that do not involve the insertion of needles and 13that are provided via technology or telecommunication methods.14    (c) The standard of care for a patient under this Act shall 15be the same whether a patient is seen in person, through 16telemedicine, or through another method of 17electronically-enabled health care. The Department shall, by 18rule, determine the appropriate acupuncture services allowed 19via telemedicine in consultation with the Board.20    (d) A person who engages in the practice of telemedicine 21without a license issued under this Act shall be subject to the 22penalties provided in Section 105.23    (e) If the Department has reason to believe that a person 24has violated this Section, the Department may issue a rule to 25show cause stating the reasons why an order to cease and desist 26should not be entered against the person. The rule shall   HB3343 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 09578 AAS 19641 b1clearly set forth the grounds relied upon by the Department 2and shall provide the person with a period of 7 days after the 3date of the rule to file an answer to the satisfaction of the 4Department. Failure to answer to the satisfaction of the 5Department shall cause an order to cease and desist to be 6issued immediately.7    (f) A person residing out of state that provides services 8through telemedicine to a patient residing in this State 9submits himself or herself to the jurisdiction of the 10Department and the courts of this State.